District of Columbia statutes.
3-1207.44

Continuing education.

The Mayor shall establish by rule continuing-education requirements as a condition for renewal of the license to practice pharmaceutical detailing.

Mar. 25, 1986, D.C. Law 6-99, § 744
as added Mar. 26, 2008, D.C. Law 17-131, § 102(g), 55 DCR 1659
This section is referenced in § 3-1205.10.